Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.110

Participant obligation—Repayment obligation—Appeals from determinations.

Participants in the Washington health corps who are awarded loan repayments shall receive payment for the purpose of repaying educational loans secured while attending a program of health professional training which led to a credential as a credentialed health professional in the state of Washington.

(1) Participants shall agree to meet the required service obligation.

(2) Repayment shall be limited to eligible educational and living expenses as determined by the office and shall include principal and interest.

(3) Loans from both government and private sources may be repaid by the program. Participants shall agree to allow the office access to loan records and to acquire information from lenders necessary to verify eligibility and to determine payments. Loans may not be renegotiated with lenders to accelerate repayment.

(4) Repayment of loans established pursuant to the Washington health corps shall begin no later than 90 days after the individual has become a participant. Payments shall be made quarterly, or more frequently if deemed appropriate by the office, to the participant until the loan is repaid or the participant becomes ineligible due to discontinued service in a health professional shortage area, an underserved behavioral health area, as a nurse educator at an approved nursing program after the required service obligation when eligibility discontinues, or as a board-certified forensic pathologist in an identified shortage area, whichever comes first.

(5) Should the participant discontinue service in a health professional shortage area, an underserved behavioral health area, as a nurse educator at an approved nursing program, or as a board-certified forensic pathologist in an identified shortage area, payments against the loans of the participants shall cease to be effective on the date that the participant discontinues service.

(6) Except for circumstances beyond their control, participants who serve less than the required service obligation shall be obligated to repay to the program an amount equal to the unsatisfied portion of the service obligation, or the total amount paid by the program on their behalf, whichever is less. This amount is due and payable immediately. Participants who are unable to pay the full amount due shall enter into a payment arrangement with the office, including an arrangement for payment of interest. The maximum period for repayment is 10 years. The office shall determine the applicability of this subsection. The interest rate shall be determined by the office and be established by rule.

(7) The office is responsible for the collection of payments made on behalf of participants from the participants who discontinue service before completion of the required service obligation. The office shall exercise due diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary records to ensure that the maximum amount of payment made on behalf of the participant is recovered. Collection under this section shall be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment if necessary.

(8) The office shall not be held responsible for any outstanding payments on principal and interest to any lenders once a participant's eligibility expires.

(9) The office shall temporarily or, in special circumstances, permanently defer the requirements of this section for eligible students as defined in RCW 28B.10.017.

(10) The office shall establish an appeal process by rule.

[ 2023 c 442 s 8; 2022 c 276 s 7; 2019 c 302 s 10; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 210; 2011 c 26 s 2. Prior: 1991 c 332 s 24; 1991 c 164 s 8; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 721. Formerly RCW 18.150.060.]

NOTES:

Intent—2023 c 442: See note following RCW 28B.115.020.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.